Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2357.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-155 of the General Laws entitled "Quasi-Public Corporations
Accountability and Transparency Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-155-11. Limitation on transfer or reallocation of funds collected by certain quasi-
public entities.
(a) Quasi-public corporations and agencies perform essential government functions and/or
provide essential government services. Many quasi-public entities are granted the public power to
collect fees and/or generate other revenue and incur debt. Since quasi-public corporations manage
significant public resources, and in order to comply with the intent of § 42-155-2, (quasi-public
corporations accountability and transparency act) all Rhode Island quasi-public corporations and
agencies should make their decisions and budgets especially transparent and open to public
scrutiny.
(b) The goals of public policy and transparency dictate that funds or monies collected by
quasi-public corporations or quasi-public agencies shall remain with the entities for use by the
entities in order to carry out their designated government functions and services and shall not be
subject to transfer or reallocation by order of or request by the governor or the general assembly to
the state's general fund or to another state agency, department, or quasi-public state agency or
corporation. In order to ensure the furtherance of the objectives of the quasi-public entities, at no
time shall the assets or other property of the entities inure to the benefit of any person or other

corporation or entity.
(c) The provisions of this section shall apply expressly to the following quasi-public state
entities:
(1) Convention center authority, established pursuant to § 42-99-4;
(2) I-195 redevelopment district, established pursuant to § 42-64.14-5;
(3) Narragansett Bay water quality management district commission, established pursuant
to § 46-25-4;
(4) Quonset development corporation, established pursuant to § 42-64.10-2;
(5) Rhode Island airport corporation, established as a semi-autonomous subsidiary of the
then Rhode Island port authority in 1992 and now the Rhode Island commerce corporation pursuant
to § 42-64-7.1;
(6) Rhode Island commerce corporation, established pursuant to § 42-64-4, and its
subsidiaries;
(7) Rhode Island health and educational building corporation, established pursuant to § 45-
38.1-4;
(8) Rhode Island housing and mortgage finance corporation, established pursuant to § 42-
55-4;
(9) Rhode Island industrial facilities corporation, established pursuant to § 45-37.l-4;
(10) Rhode Island industrial-recreational building authority, established pursuant to § 42-
34-4;
(11) Rhode Island infrastructure bank, established pursuant to § 46-12.2-3;
(12) Rhode Island public rail corporation, established pursuant to § 42-64.2-2;
(13) Rhode Island public transit authority, established pursuant to § 39-18-2;
(14) Rhode Island refunding bond authority, established pursuant to § 35-8.1-4;
(15) Rhode Island resource recovery corporation, established pursuant to § 23-19-6;
(16) Rhode Island student loan authority, established pursuant to § 16-62-4;
(17) Rhode Island tobacco settlement financing corporation, established pursuant to § 42-
133-4;
(18) Rhode Island turnpike and bridge authority, established pursuant to § 24-12-2;
(19) Small business loan fund corporation, established pursuant to chapter 64 of title 42;
and
(20) Water resources board (corporate), established pursuant to § 46-15.1-2.
LC004565 - Page 2 of 4

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004565
========
LC004565 - Page 3 of 4